Illinois, session 104th, SB406.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Early Childhood Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-30 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 3/1-30)7    Sec. 1-30. General powers and duties. 8    (a) The Department shall exercise the rights, powers, 9duties, and functions provided by law, including, but not 10limited to, the rights, powers, duties, and functions 11transferred to the Department.12    (a-5) The Department shall establish an Early Childhood 13Integrated Data System (ECIDS) to make equity driven, 14inclusive, and data-informed decisions that create a simpler, 15better, and fairer system for all Illinois children and 16families. The ECIDS shall be designed and maintained to allow 17for data integration and sharing with other State agencies and 18other entities that maintain State data within the State early 19childhood ecosystem as needed for cross-agency collaboration 20and to the extent permitted by State and federal requirements. 21    The Department shall develop public analytic portals and 22query tools for parents and communities to access aggregated 23integrated data from the ECIDS system to the extent permitted   SB0406 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06643 HLH 16679 b1by State and federal confidentiality requirements. 2    (b) The Department may employ personnel (in accordance 3with the Personnel Code and any applicable collective 4bargaining agreements), provide facilities, contract for goods 5and services, and adopt rules as necessary to carry out its 6functions and purposes, all in accordance with applicable 7State and federal law.8    The Department may establish such subdivisions of the 9Department as shall be desirable and assign to the various 10subdivisions the responsibilities and duties placed upon the 11Department by the Laws of the State of Illinois. 12    The Department shall adopt, as necessary, rules for the 13execution of its powers. The provisions of the Illinois 14Administrative Procedure Act are hereby expressly adopted and 15shall apply to all administrative rules and procedures of the 16Department under this Act, except that Section 5-35 of the 17Illinois Administrative Procedure Act relating to procedures 18for rulemaking does not apply to the adoption of any rule 19required by federal law in connection with which the 20Department is precluded by law from exercising any discretion. 21    (c) Procurements necessary for the Department of Early 22Childhood to implement this Act are subject to the Illinois 23Procurement Code, except as otherwise provided in paragraph 24(25) of subsection (b) of Section 1-10 of that Code. The 25Department of Early Childhood is subject to the Business 26Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with   SB0406 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06643 HLH 16679 b1Disabilities Act.2(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.)